apertium_magahi_in_canonical_form.dix
<pardef n="KA/__v">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e> 
<e><p><l>nA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>nA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_iwa"/></r></p></e>  
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_iwa"/></r></p></e> 
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_iwa"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adv_iwa"/></r></p></e> 
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adv_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adv_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adv_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adv_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adv_iwa"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adv_iwa"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_ela"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_ela"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_ela"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_ela"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_ela"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_ela"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_ela"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_ela"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hE"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hau</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hau"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hau</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hau"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hau</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hau"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hau</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hau"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hava</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hava"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hava</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hava"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hava</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hava"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hava</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hava"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_haina</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_haina"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_haina</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_haina"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_haina</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_haina"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_haina</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_haina"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_haina</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_haina"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_haina</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_haina"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hai</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hai</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hai</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iwa_rahe_ke_hai</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hai"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="harav/AhA__n"><!--baurAhA caravAhA harabahiniAM caravahiniAM  baurahiniAM -->
    <e><p><l>AhA</l><r>AhA<s n="cat:n"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>Ahi</l><r>AhA<s n="cat:n"/><s n="gen:ne"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>Ahiye</l><r>AhA<s n="cat:n"/><s n="gen:ne"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="harab/__n">
    <e><p><l>ahiniAM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="gen:ne"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kar/Aha__n">
    <e><p><l>Aha</l><r>AhA<s n="cat:n"/><s n="gen:ne"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ahavana</l><r>AhA<s n="cat:n"/><s n="gen:ne"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="xal/Ana__n">
    <e><p><l>Ana</l><r>Ana<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>anavana</l><r>Ana<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>Ane</l><r>Ana<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Kati/A__n">
    <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>vana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ve</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="maci/A__n">
    <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>vana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ve</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bAw/a__n">
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iana</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iyA</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kevAri/__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pandIwa/__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>loga</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pariAIna/__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sab</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="KA"><i>KA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="harav"><i>harav</i><par n="harav/AhA__n"/></e>
<e lm="carav"><i>carav</i><par n="harav/AhA__n"/></e>
<e lm="kar"><i>kar</i><par n="kar/Aha__n"/></e>
<e lm="bi"><i>bi</i><par n="kar/Aha__n"/></e>
<e lm="sal"><i>sal</i><par n="kar/Aha__n"/></e>
<e lm="xal"><i>xal</i><par n="xal/Ana__n"/></e>
<e lm="mak"><i>mak</i><par n="xal/Ana__n"/></e>
<e lm="xok"><i>xok</i><par n="xal/Ana__n"/></e>
<e lm="harab"><i>harab</i><par n="harab/__n"/></e>
<e lm="baur"><i>baur</i><par n="harab/__n"/></e>
<e lm="carav"><i>carav</i><par n="harab/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bAw"><i>bAw</i><par n="bAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="Kati"><i>Kati</i><par n="Kati/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="maci"><i>maci</i><par n="Kati/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="maci"><i>maci</i><par n="maci/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="kevAri"><i>kevAri</i><par n="kevAri/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pandIwa"><i>pandIwa</i><par n="pandIwa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pariAIna"><i>pariAIna</i><par n="pariAIna/__n"/></e>
